Maine, session 132, LD1567.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §115 is enacted to read:
§115. Radiation treatment and ozonation equipment
1. Radiation treatment and ozonation equipment. Equipment used to treat adult use
cannabis or an adult use cannabis product with radiation or ozone must be registered with
the office, subject to inspection under subsection 2. The office shall make a list of
equipment under this section available, including on a publicly accessible website.
2. Inspection and operation. The office, in coordination with the division of
environmental and community health within the Department of Health and Human
Services, shall:
A. Inspect equipment under subsection 1 prior to approving the equipment for
registration; and
B. Develop guidance for the equipment's operation, including worker and product
safety.
3. Rules. The office shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. 28-B MRSA §701, sub-§1, ¶K, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 409, Pt. A, §6
and amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
K. For edible cannabis products, a nutritional fact panel; and
Sec. 3. 28-B MRSA §701, sub-§1, ¶K-1 is enacted to read:
K-1. Information on any radiation treatment or ozonation applied to the cannabis or
cannabis product; and